Mississippi statutes. Title 17. Local Government; Provisions Common to Counties and Municipalities
Mississippi Regional Solid Waste Management Authority Act

§ 17-17-301.
Short title.

Sections 17-17-301 through 17-17-349 shall be known and cited as the “Mississippi Regional Solid Waste Management Authority Act.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 581, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 12, 1991).

§ 17-17-303.
Legislative findings.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares: that the collection, disposal and utilization of municipal solid waste is a matter of grave concern to all citizens and is an activity thoroughly affected with the public interest; that the health, safety and welfare of the people of this state require efficient municipal solid waste collection and disposal service; that there is a need for planning, research, development and innovation in the design, management and operation of facilities for municipal solid waste management, to encourage continuing improvement and provide adequate incentives and processes for reducing operation and other costs in the management of municipal solid waste; to provide for the collection and disposal of municipal solid waste and to encourage planning of municipal solid waste collection and disposal service, it is necessary and desirable to authorize the creation of regional authorities by counties and municipalities to acquire, construct, operate and maintain municipal solid waste management facilities.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 581, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 12, 1991).

§ 17-17-305.
Definitions.

Whenever used in Sections 17-17-301 through 17-17-349, the following words and terms shall have the following respective meanings unless a different meaning clearly appears from the context:

“Authority” means a regional solid waste management authority created under Sections 17-17-301 through 17-17-349.

“Board” means the board of commissioners of an authority.

“Bonds” means either revenue bonds, general obligation bonds, bond anticipation notes, or other types of debt instruments issued by the authority unless the reference to bonds clearly indicates “revenue bonds,” “general obligation bonds,” “bond anticipation notes” or such other forms of debt instruments.

“Cost of project” means all costs of site preparation and other start-up costs; all costs of construction; all costs of real and personal property required for the purposes of the project and facilities related thereto, including land and any rights or undivided interest therein, easements, franchises, fees, permits, approvals, licenses, and certificates and the securing of such permits, approvals, licenses, and certificates and all machinery and equipment, including motor vehicles which are used for project functions; and including any cost associated with the closure, post-closure maintenance or corrective action, financing charges and interest prior to and during construction and during such additional period as the authority may reasonably determine to be necessary for the placing of the project in operation; costs of engineering, geotechnical, architectural and legal services; costs of plans and specifications and all expenses necessary or incident to determining the feasibility or practicability of the project; administrative expenses; and such other expenses as may be necessary or incidental to the financing authorized in Sections 17-17-301 through 17-17-349. The costs of any project may also include funds for the creation of a debt service reserve, a renewal and replacement reserve, and such other reserves as may be reasonably required by the authority for the operation of its projects and as may be authorized by any bond resolution or trust agreement or indenture pursuant to the provisions of which the issuance of any such bonds may be authorized. Any obligation or expense incurred for any of the foregoing purposes shall be regarded as a part of the costs of the project and may be paid or reimbursed as such out of the proceeds of user fees, of revenue bonds or notes issued under Sections 17-17-301 through 17-17-349 for such project, or from other revenues obtained by the authority.

“County” means any county of this state.

“Department” means the Department of Environmental Quality.

“Designated representative” means the person named by resolution of the governing body of a county or municipal corporation as the representative of such unit of local government for the purpose of acting on their behalf as an incorporator in concert with other similarly named persons in the creation and incorporation of a regional authority under Sections 17-17-301 through 17-17-349.

“Facilities” means any plant, structure, building, improvement, land, or any other real or personal property used or useful in a project under Sections 17-17-301 through 17-17-349.

“Governing body” means the elected or duly appointed officials constituting the governing body of a municipality or county.

“Incorporation agreement” means that agreement between the designated representatives of various units of local government setting forth the formal creation of a regional authority under Sections 17-17-301 through 17-17-349.

“Incorporator” means the “designated representative.”

“Member” means a unit of local government participating in an authority.

“Municipal solid waste” means any nonhazardous solid waste resulting from the operation of residential, commercial, governmental, industrial or institutional establishments except oil field exploration and production wastes and sewage sludge.

“Municipality” means any incorporated city or town in this state.

“Person” means a person as defined in Section 17-17-3, Mississippi Code of 1972.

“Post-closure” means a procedure approved by the Environmental Protection Agency, or the department to provide for long-term financial assurance, monitoring, and maintenance of solid waste disposal sites to protect human health and the environment.

“Project” means:

The collection, transportation, management and disposal of municipal solid waste, including closure and post-closure and any property, real or personal, used as or in connection with a facility for the composting, extraction, collection, storage, treatment, processing, utilization, or final disposal of resources contained in solid waste, including the conversion of municipal solid waste or resources contained therein into compost, oil, charcoal, gas, steam, or any other product or energy source and the collection, storage, treatment, utilization, processing, or final disposal of solid waste in connection with the foregoing; and

Any property, real or personal, used as or in connection with a facility for the composting, extraction, collection, storage, treatment, processing and the conversion of such resources into any compost or useful form of energy.

“Public agency” means any incorporated city or town, county, political subdivision, governmental district or unit, public corporation, public institution of higher learning, community college district, planning and development district, or governmental agency created under the laws of the state.

“Resource recovery facility” means any facility at which solid waste is processed for the purpose of extracting, converting to energy or otherwise separating and preparing solid waste for reuse.

“Revenues” means all rentals, receipts, income and other charges derived or received or to be derived or received by the authority from any of the following: the operation by the authority of a facility or facilities, or part thereof; the sale, including installment sales or conditional sales, lease, sublease or use or other disposition of any facility or portion thereof; the sale, lease or other disposition of recovered resources; contracts, agreements or franchises with respect to a facility (or portion thereof), with respect to recovered resources, or with respect to a facility (or portion thereof) and recovered resources, including but not limited to charges with respect to the management of municipal solid waste received with respect to a facility, income received as a result of the sale or other disposition of recovered resources; any gift or grant received with respect thereto; proceeds of bonds to the extent of use thereof for payment of principal of, premium, if any, or interest on the bonds as authorized by the authority; proceeds from any insurance, condemnation or guaranty pertaining to a facility or property mortgaged to secure bonds or pertaining to the financing of a facility; income and profit from the investment of the proceeds of bonds or of any revenues and the proceeds of any special tax to which it may be entitled.

“Solid waste” means solid waste as defined in Section 17-17-3, Mississippi Code of 1972.

“Municipal solid waste management facility” means any land, building, plant, system, motor vehicles, equipment or other property, whether real, personal or mixed, or any combination of either thereof, used or useful or capable of future use in the collection, storage, treatment, utilization, recycling, processing, transporting or disposal of municipal solid waste, including transfer stations, incinerators, sanitary landfill facilities or other facilities necessary or desirable.

“Solid waste landfill” means a disposal facility where any amount of solid waste, whether or not mixed with or including other waste allowed under Subtitle D of the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act of 1976, as amended, is disposed of by means of placing an approved cover thereon.

“State” means the State of Mississippi.

“Unit of local government” means any county or municipality of the state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 581, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved April 12, 1991).

§ 17-17-307.
Creation of authority.

Any unit of local government or any combination thereof may form a regional solid waste management authority. Creation of an authority shall be initiated by ordinance or resolution duly adopted by the governing body of each unit of local government. The ordinance or resolution shall state the necessity for the authority, the primary function, and authorize a designated representative of the unit of local government to enter into an incorporation agreement with the other units of local government. The authority is created and established as a public body corporate and politic constituting a political subdivision of the state and shall be deemed to be acting in all respects for the benefit of the people of the state in the performance of essential public functions and the authority shall be empowered in accordance with Sections 17-17-301 through 17-17-349 to promote the health, welfare and prosperity of the general public.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 581, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved April 12, 1991).

§ 17-17-309.
Incorporation of authority.

Within forty (40) days following the adoption of the final authorizing resolution, the designated representatives shall proceed to incorporate an authority by filing for record in the office of the chancery clerk of the participating counties and the Secretary of State an incorporation agreement approved by each member. The agreement shall comply in form and substance with the requirements of this section and shall be executed in the manner provided in Sections 17-17-301 through 17-17-349.

The incorporation agreement of an authority shall state:

The name of each participating unit of local government and the date on which the governing bodies thereof adopted an authorizing resolution;

The name of the authority which must include the words “. . . . . . . . Solid Waste Management Authority,” or “The Solid Waste Management Authority of . . . . . . . . . .,” the blank spaces to be filled in with the name of one or more of the members or other geographically descriptive term. If the Secretary of State determines that the name is identical to the name of any other corporation organized under the laws of the state or so nearly similar as to lead to confusion and uncertainty, the incorporators may insert additional identifying words so as to eliminate any duplication or similarity;

The period for the duration of the authority;

The location of the principal office of the authority which shall be within the boundaries of the members;

That the authority is organized pursuant to Sections 17-17-301 through 17-17-349;

The board setting forth the number of commissioners, terms of office and the vote of each commissioner;

If the exercise by the authority of any of its powers is to be in any way prohibited, limited or conditioned, a statement of the terms of such prohibition, limitation or condition;

Any provisions relating to the vesting of title to its properties upon its dissolution which shall be vested in any member; and

Any other related matters relating to the authority that the incorporators may choose to insert and that are not inconsistent with Sections 17-17-301 through 17-17-349 or with the laws of the state.

The incorporation agreement shall be signed and acknowledged by the incorporators before an officer authorized by the laws of the state to take acknowledgements. When the incorporation agreement is filed for record, there shall be attached to it a certified copy of the authorizing resolution adopted by the governing body of each member.

The incorporators shall publish a notice of incorporation once a week for two (2) successive weeks in a daily newspaper or newspapers having general circulation throughout the region to be served.

Upon the filing for record of the agreement and the required documents, the authority shall come into existence and shall constitute a public corporation under the name set forth in the incorporation agreement. The Secretary of State shall thereupon issue a certificate of incorporation to the authority.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 581, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved April 12, 1991).

§ 17-17-311.
Amendment of incorporation agreement; withdrawal of member from authority; effect of withdrawal.

The incorporation agreement of any authority may be amended in the manner provided in this section. The board of the authority shall first adopt a resolution proposing an amendment to the incorporation agreement. The amendment shall be set forth in full in the resolution and may include any matters which might have been included in the original incorporation agreement.

After the adoption of the resolution by the board, the chairman of the board and the secretary of the authority shall file a certified copy of the resolution and a signed written application in the name of and on behalf of the authority, under its seal, with the governing body of each member, requesting the governing body to adopt a resolution approving the proposed amendment. As promptly as may be practicable after the filing of the application with the governing body, that governing body shall review the application and shall adopt a resolution either denying the application or authorizing the proposed amendment. Any such resolution shall be published in a newspaper or newspapers as provided in subsection (4) of Section 17-17-309. The governing body shall cause a copy of the application and all accompanying documents to be spread upon or otherwise made a part of the minutes of the meeting of the governing body at which final action upon the application is taken. The incorporation agreement may be amended only after the adoption of a resolution by two-thirds (2/3) of the governing bodies of the members. Publication of such amendment shall be made as provided in subsection (4) of Section 17-17-309.

Within forty (40) days following the adoption of the last adopted resolution approving the proposed amendment, the chairman of the board and the secretary of the authority shall sign, and file for record in the office of the chancery clerk with which the incorporation agreement of the authority was originally filed and the Secretary of State, a certificate in the name of and in behalf of the authority, under its seal, reciting the adoption of the respective resolutions by the board and by the governing body of each member and setting forth the amendment. The chancery clerk for such county shall record the certificate in an appropriate book in his office. When such certificate has been so filed and recorded, the amendment shall become effective. No incorporation agreement of an authority shall be amended except in the manner provided in this section.

Any member of a regional solid waste management authority may withdraw from the authority by submitting a resolution to the board requesting an amendment to the incorporation agreement pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. Upon compliance with the requirements of subsections (1) through (3) of this section and the payment of its pro rata share of any indebtedness, costs, expenses or obligations of the authority outstanding at the time of withdrawal, the amendment may become effective upon adoption of the resolution by the board. The withdrawal of a member shall not operate to impair, invalidate, release or abrogate any contract, lien, bond, permit, indebtedness or obligation of the authority, except to relieve the withdrawing member from further financial obligation to the authority.

After the issuance of a permit by the permit board for the construction and operation of a solid waste landfill, any withdrawal of the situs county from the authority shall not affect the ability of the authority to operate a solid waste landfill upon the site for which the permit has been issued.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 581, § 6; Laws, 1994, ch. 308, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 1, 1994).

§ 17-17-313.
Board of commissioners of authority; employees; budget.

All powers of the authority shall be vested in the board of commissioners. Each member of the authority shall have at least one (1) commissioner on the board.

The incorporators shall by duly adopted resolution or bylaws designate the vote of each commissioner based upon pro rata population, municipal solid waste volume or such other criteria as they may determine. In the alternative, the incorporators by duly adopted resolution, may authorize appointments to the board by the members to reflect population, municipal solid waste volume or such other criteria as the incorporators may determine. In addition, the incorporators shall designate a term for each commissioner at the time of incorporation so as to establish staggered terms of office. No commissioner shall serve for a term to exceed four (4) years unless duly reappointed. Such resolutions for the composition of the board and the vote of its commissioners shall be filed with the incorporation agreement.

Initially, the board shall be composed as follows:

Within thirty (30) days of the effective date of the incorporation agreement, the board of supervisors of each participating county and the mayor of each municipality acting on behalf and with the consent of the governing body of each participating municipality shall appoint at least one (1) person to the board as determined by the resolution of the incorporators.

The governing body of each county or municipality shall appoint only individuals who are residents of its respective county or municipality or an employee thereof.

The number of commissioners of the board shall be increased by at least one (1) each time a county or municipality enters into membership and executes a contract for solid waste management. The board shall establish the vote or number of commissioners based upon the same terms as the original resolution of the incorporators. Within fifteen (15) days of entering into the contract, the governing body of the county or municipality, entering into such contract shall appoint at least one (1) person to the board. Any commissioner appointed under the provision shall serve for a term of four (4) years.

After the initial term, the commissioners shall serve a term of four (4) years, and for such period thereafter until a successor shall be duly appointed and qualified.

Upon selection of a site for any municipal solid waste management facility owned and/or operated by the authority, the situs county shall have a minimum representation at least as great as any single member. Such representation shall include a minimum of one (1) commissioner from the supervisor district in which the facility is located. The supervisor of the district or his designee shall serve in this position.

Each commissioner of the board shall be eligible for reappointment. All vacancies shall be filled by appointment in the same manner, provided that any person appointed to fill a vacancy shall serve only for the unexpired term. Any commissioner may be removed at any time prior to the expiration of the member’s term of office for misfeasance, malfeasance or willful neglect of duty, as determined by the appointing political subdivision. Before assuming office, each commissioner shall take and subscribe to the constitutional oath of office before a chancery clerk, and a record of such oath shall be filed with the Secretary of State. The board of commissioners shall annually select a chairman and a vice-chairman.

The board may appoint an executive committee to be composed of not less than five (5) persons. No member shall have more than one (1) representative on the executive committee. The chairman of the board shall serve as chairman of the executive committee. The executive committee is empowered to execute all powers vested in the full board between meetings of the board. A majority plus one (1) shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. All actions of the executive committee must be ratified by a majority of the board at a regular or called meeting of the board.

The board may employ such personnel and appoint and prescribe the duties of such officers as the board deems necessary or advisable, including a general manager and a secretary of the authority. The general manager may also serve as secretary and shall be a person of good moral character and of proven ability as an administrator with a minimum of five (5) years’ experience in the management and administration of a public works operation or comparable experience which may include, but is not limited to, supervision, public financing, regulatory codes and related functions as minimum qualifications to administer the programs and duties of the authority. The general manager shall administer, manage and direct the affairs and business of the authority, subject to the policies, control and direction of the board. The general manager and any commissioner not bonded in another capacity shall give bond executed by a surety company or companies authorized to do business in this state in the penal sum of Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) payable to the authority conditioned upon the faithful performance of his duties and the proper accounting for all funds. The board may require any of its employees to be bonded. The cost of any bond required by this section or by the board shall be paid from funds of the authority. The secretary shall keep a record of the proceedings of the authority and shall be custodian of all books, documents and papers filed with the authority, the minute book or journal, and the official seal. The secretary may make copies of all minutes and other records and documents of the authority and to certify under the seal of the authority that such copies are true and accurate copies, and all persons dealing with the authority may rely upon such certificates.

Regular meetings of the board shall be held as set forth in its bylaws, rules or regulations. Additional meetings of the board shall be held at the call of the chairman or whenever any three (3) commissioners so request.

Upon express, prior authorization of the authority, each commissioner may receive compensation in an amount not to exceed Forty Dollars ($40.00) per day for attending each day’s meeting of the board and for each day spent in attending to the business of the authority and, in addition, may receive reimbursement for actual and necessary expenses incurred as provided by Section 25-3-41, Mississippi Code of 1972. Each commissioner shall not be entitled to any additional compensation other than that specifically provided for in this subsection.

The board shall prepare a budget for the authority for each fiscal year at least ninety (90) days prior to the beginning of each fiscal year, which shall be from July 1 to June 30 of each year, and shall submit it to the governing body of each member.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 581, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved April 12, 1991).

§ 17-17-315.
Administrative office; contracts for provision of staff support, administrative and operational services; preparation, development and review of solid waste management plan.

The board may contract with and designate a local planning and development district in its jurisdiction to serve as the administrative office of the authority and to provide such staff support as may be necessary for the operation and administration of the authority. In addition, the board may contract with any county or municipality to provide support services and any member may contract with or as part of their service contract with the authority to provide such staff support, administrative and operational services as it deems advisable and on such terms as may be mutually agreed.

At the request of the board, the planning and development district shall coordinate and assist in the preparation and development of any solid waste management plan required by state law. A review of such plan shall be provided the board each year and periodically updated as determined to be necessary or as may be required by law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 581, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved April 12, 1991).

§ 17-17-317.
Powers of authority generally.

From and after the creation of an authority it shall be a public corporation participating under its corporate name and shall, in that name, be a body politic and corporate with all the rights and powers necessary or convenient to carry out the purposes of Sections 17-17-301 through 17-17-349, including, but not limited to the following:

To sue and be sued in its own name;

To adopt an official seal and alter the same at pleasure;

To maintain an office or offices at such place or places within the management area as it may determine;

To acquire, construct, improve, or modify, to operate or cause to be operated and maintained, either as owner of all or of any part in common with others, a project or projects within the counties or municipalities in the district and, to pay all or part of the cost of any such project or projects from the proceeds of bonds of the authority or from any contribution or loans by persons, firms, public agencies or corporations or from any other contribution or user fees, all of which the authority is authorized to receive, accept, and use and to pay all cost of operation and maintenance as may be determined as necessary for preparation of any project;

To acquire, in its own name, by purchase on such terms and conditions and in such manner as it may deem proper, by condemnation in accordance with all laws applicable to the condemnation of property for public use, or by gift, grant, lease, or otherwise, real property or easements therein, franchises and personal property necessary or convenient for its corporate purposes. These purposes shall include, but are not limited to, the constructing or acquiring of a project; the improving, extending, reconstructing, renovating, or remodeling of any existing project or part thereof; or the demolition to make room for such project or any part thereof and to insure the same against any and all risks as such insurance may, from time to time, be available. The authority may also use such property and rent or lease the same to or from others including public agencies or make contracts for the use thereof or sell, lease, exchange, transfer, assign, pledge, mortgage or grant a security interest for any such property, provided that the powers to acquire, use, and dispose of property as set forth in this paragraph shall include the power to acquire, use, and dispose of any interest in such property, whether divided or undivided. Title to any such property of the authority, however, shall be held by the authority exclusively for the benefit of the public;

To make, enforce, amend and repeal bylaws and rules and regulations for the management of its business and affairs and for the use, maintenance and operation of any of its project facilities and any other of its properties;

To fix, charge, collect, maintain, and revise rates, fees and other charges for any services rendered by it to any person or public agency;

To make contracts and leases with any person or public agency and to execute all instruments necessary or convenient for construction, operation, and maintenance of projects and leases of projects; and including the closure, post-closure maintenance and any required corrective action involving a project provided that all private persons, firms, and corporations, this state, and all units of local government, departments, instrumentalities, or agencies of the state or of local government are authorized to enter into contracts, leases or agreements with the authority, upon such terms and for such purposes as they deem advisable; and, without limiting the generality of the above, authority is specifically granted to municipalities and counties and to the authority to enter into contracts, lease agreements, or other undertaking relative to the furnishing of project activities and facilities or either of them by the authority to such municipalities and counties and by such municipalities and counties to the authority for a term not exceeding thirty (30) years;

To borrow money and to issue bonds for any of its purposes, except bonds may not be issued for operating costs, to provide for and secure the payment thereof, and to provide for the rights of the holders thereof;

To invest any monies of the authority, including proceeds from the sale of any bonds subject to any agreements with bondholders, on such terms and in such manner as the authority deems proper;

To exercise any one or more of the powers, rights, and privileges conferred by Sections 17-17-301 through 17-17-349 either alone or jointly or in common with one or more other public or private parties. In any such exercise of such powers, rights, and privileges jointly or in common with others for the construction, operation, and maintenance of facilities, the authority may own an undivided interest in such facilities with any other party with which it may jointly or in common exercise the rights and privileges conferred by Sections 17-17-301 through 17-17-349 and may enter into an agreement or agreements with respect to any such facility with the other party or parties participating therein. An agreement may contain such terms, conditions, and provisions, consistent with this section, as the parties thereto shall deem to be in their best interest, including, but not limited to, provisions for the construction, operation, and maintenance of such facility by any one or more party of the parties to such agreement. The party or parties shall be designated in or pursuant to such agreement as agent or agents on behalf of itself and one or more of the other parties thereto, or by such other means as may be determined by the parties thereto, and including provisions for a method or methods of determining and allocating, among or between the parties, costs of construction, operation, maintenance, renewals, replacements, improvements, and disposal related to such facility. In carrying out its functions and activities as such agent with respect to construction, operation, and maintenance of such a facility, such agent shall be governed by the laws and regulations applicable to such agent as a separate legal entity and not by any laws or regulations which may be applicable to any of the other participating parties. The agent shall act for the benefit of the public. The authority shall not delegate its right of eminent domain or power of condemnation. Pursuant to any such agreement, the authority may delegate its powers and duties related to the construction, operation, and maintenance of such facility to the party acting as agent and all actions taken by such agent in accordance with the agreement may be binding upon the authority without further action or approval of the authority;

To apply, contract for, accept, receive and administer gifts, grants, appropriations, and donations of money, materials, and property of any kind, including loans and grants from the United States, the state, a unit of local government, or any agency, department, authority, or instrumentality of any of the foregoing, upon such terms and conditions as the United States, the state, a unit of local government, or such agency, department, authority, or instrumentality shall impose; to administer trusts; and to sell, lease, transfer, convey, appropriate and pledge any and all of its property and assets;

To do any and all things necessary or proper for the accomplishment of the objectives of this section and to exercise any power usually possessed by private corporations performing similar functions which is not in conflict with the Constitution and laws of the state, including the power to employ professional and administrative staff and personnel and to retain legal, engineering, fiscal, accounting and other professional services; the power to purchase all kinds of insurance, including without limitations, insurance against tort liability and against risks of damage to property; and the power to act as self-insurer with respect to any loss or liability. The obligations of the authority other than revenue bonds shall be payable from the general funds of the authority and shall not be a charge against any special fund allocated to the payment of revenue bonds;

To borrow money and issue its bonds from time to time and to use the proceeds to pay all or part of the capital costs of any project, or for closure, corrective action or post-closure maintenance of such project or for refunding any such bonds of the authority; and otherwise to carry out the purposes of this section and to pay all other capital costs but not operating costs of the authority incident to, or necessary and appropriate to, such purposes, including the providing of funds to be paid into any fund to secure such bonds and notes and to provide for the rights of the holder thereof;

To assume or continue any contractual or other business relationships entered into by the municipalities or counties who are members of the authority, including the rights to receive and acquire transferred rights under option to purchase agreements and permit application;

To enter on any lands, waters, or premises for the purpose of making surveys, borings, soundings and examinations for the purposes of the authority;

To do and perform any acts and things authorized by Sections 17-17-301 through 17-17-349 under, through or by means of its officers, agents and employees, or by contracts with any person;

To enter into any and all contracts, execute any and all instruments, and do and perform any and all acts or things necessary, convenient or desirable for the purposes of the authority, or to carry out any power expressly granted in Sections 17-17-301 through 17-17-349 including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, contracts with public agencies, and such public agencies are hereby also empowered to enter into such contracts with the authority, which may include provisions for exclusive dealing, fee payment requirements, territorial division, and other conduct or arrangements which may have an anticompetitive effect;

To enter into contracts with any municipality or county which is a member of the authority for the closure or post-closure maintenance of a municipal solid waste management facility owned and operated by such county or municipality; and

To exercise the power of eminent domain for the particular purpose of the acquisition of property designated by plan to sufficiently accommodate the location of facilities, and such requirements related directly thereto pursuant to Chapter 27, Title 11, Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 581, § 9, eff from and after passage (approved April 12, 1991).